Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.026

Examination of code—Hearings—Recommendations to legislature.

The committee also shall examine the revised code and from time to time submit to the legislature proposals for enactment of the several titles, chapters and sections thereof, to the end that, as expeditiously as possible, the revised code, and each part thereof, shall constitute conclusive, rather than prima facie evidence of the law. Each such proposal shall be accompanied by explanatory matter. The committee may hold hearings concerning any such proposal or concerning recommendations formulated or to be formulated in accordance with RCW 1.08.025. Proposals or recommendations approved by the committee shall be submitted to the chair of the house or senate judiciary committee at the commencement of the next succeeding session of the legislature.

[ 2011 c 336 s 3; 1959 c 95 s 4; 1953 c 257 s 9.]